Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Mississippi Development Authority Job Training Grant Fund

§ 57-1-451.
Mississippi Development Authority Job Training Grant Fund created; use of funds.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the “Mississippi Development Authority Job Training Grant Fund” into which shall be deposited such money as provided in Section 27-65-75(21)(b). The money in the fund shall be used for the purpose of making job training grants to community and junior colleges, public universities and local workforce investment areas to pay a portion of the costs of providing training or retraining for employees of business enterprises that are eligible for the jobs tax credit authorized in Section 57-73-21. The fund shall be administered by the Mississippi Development Authority (MDA). Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned on or investment earnings on the amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. The MDA may use not more than one percent (1%) of interest earned or investment earnings, or both, on amounts in the fund for administration and management of the incentive program authorized under this section.

Subject to the provisions of this section, job training grants may be made by the MDA to a community or junior college, public university or local workforce investment area to pay costs incurred in training or retraining employees for a business enterprise that is eligible for the jobs tax credit authorized in Section 57-73-21. A business enterprise that chooses to utilize a job training grant under this section shall not be eligible for the job tax credit authorized in Section 57-73-21. The election to utilize a job training grant shall be made by the business enterprise before the creation of any jobs. The grant payments may be made during a five-year period beginning with years two (2) through six (6) after the creation of the minimum number of jobs required by the MDA. The amount of the grants authorized by this section shall be seventy-five percent (75%) of the costs of training or retraining employees not to exceed:

One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per job in counties designated as Tier One areas under Section 57-73-21;

One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) per job in counties designated as Tier Two areas under Section 57-73-21; and

Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) per job in counties designated as Tier Three areas under Section 57-73-21.

The MDA shall cease making job training grant payments if it determines the required number of jobs are not being maintained by the business enterprise.

The MDA shall require that the business enterprise shall enter into binding commitments requiring that:

A minimum number of jobs be maintained that shall not be less than the number of jobs required to be eligible for the jobs tax credit authorized in Section 57-73-21; and

That if the minimum number of jobs are not maintained, all or a portion of the grant funds paid under this section, as determined by the MDA, shall be repaid by the business enterprise.

The MDA shall develop, implement and administer the job training grant program authorized under this section and shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the development, implementation and administration of the program.

A business enterprise desiring to utilize job training grants under this section must submit requests for job training grants to the MDA. The MDA shall review the request and determine if the business enterprise is eligible and if a payment shall be made from the fund. The liability of the State of Mississippi to make the job training grants authorized under this section shall be limited to the balance contained in the fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 447, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.